Wisconsin, session 2025, SB674.
do enact as follows:SB674,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB674,2,4271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 3amount of any loss arising from theft to the extent that the theft loss is deductible 4in the taxable year under section 165 (c) (2) or (3) of the Internal Revenue Code. SB674,25Section 2. 71.07 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB674,2,10671.07 (5) (a) 3. Casualty and theft deductions under section 165 (c) (3) of the 7internal revenue code Internal Revenue Code, except for casualty losses that are 8directly related to a presidentially declared disaster under 26 USC section 7508A of 9the Internal Revenue Code. No addition may be made under this subdivision for 10any amount for which a subtraction is made under s. 71.05 (6) (b) 57.SB674,2,1111